Florida, session 2026, HB1429.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:
30
31 Section 1. Section 381.9811, Florida Statutes, is created
32 to read:
33 381.9811 Licensure of medical spas.—
34 (1) SHORT TITLE.—This section may be cited as the "Medical
35 Spa Prescription Drug Oversight Act."
36 (2)(a) FINDINGS AND PURPOSE.—The Legislature finds that
37 patients are increasingly turning to medical spas for cosmetic
38 and medical procedures. Many of these medical spas prepare and
39 administer prescription medications intended to be sterile,
40 either compounded or commercially available formulations, with
41 no regulatory oversight by the Board of Pharmacy, which raises
42 significant patient safety concerns.
43 (b) The purpose of this section is to license a medical
44 spa that prepares, handles, stores, administers, dispenses,
45 distributes, or otherwise uses prescription medications at the
46 medical spa or in connection with providing services.
47 (3) DEFINITIONS.—As used in this section, the term:
48 (a) "Adverse event" means any untoward medical occurrence
49 associated with the use of a prescription medication, whether or
50 not the event itself is considered prescription medication-
Page 2 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1429 2026
51 related.
52 (b) "Board" means the Board of Pharmacy.
53 (c) "Medical spa" means any facility or practice that
54 offers medical or health care services and that holds itself out
55 as a facility or practice focused on cosmetic or lifestyle
56 treatments, such as weight loss, wellness, longevity, or
57 cosmetic or aesthetic health care services, including, but not
58 limited to, the preparation, administration, or dispensing of
59 prescription drugs for weight loss; botulinum toxin injections;
60 hormone therapies; or parenteral nutrient therapies. The term
61 does not include a facility or practice that otherwise holds a
62 health care facility license from the state.
63 (d) "Person" means an individual, a corporation, a
64 government, a governmental subdivision or agency, a statutory
65 trust, a business trust, an estate, a trust, a partnership, or
66 an unincorporated association, or one or more of the foregoing
67 having a joint or common interest, or any other legal or
68 commercial entity.
69 (e) "Prescription medication" means any drug, including,
70 but not limited to, finished dosage forms or active ingredients
71 that are subject to, defined in, or described in s. 503(b) of
72 the Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act or in s. 465.003, s.
73 499.003(17), s. 499.007(13), or s. 499.82(10). The term includes
74 any biological product, except for blood and blood components
75 intended for transfusion or biological products that are also
Page 3 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1429 2026
76 medical devices.
77 (f) "Responsible person" means a licensed healthcare
78 provider with supervising authority at a medical spa.
79 (g) "Serious adverse event" means an adverse event or
80 suspected adverse reaction that results in death, a life-
81 threatening adverse event, inpatient hospitalization or
82 prolongation of existing hospitalization, a persistent or
83 significant incapacity or substantial disruption of the ability
84 to conduct normal life functions, or a congenital anomaly or
85 birth defect. The term includes events that may be considered
86 serious when, based upon appropriate medical judgment, such
87 events may jeopardize the patient's health and may require
88 medical or surgical intervention to prevent one of the outcomes
89 listed in this paragraph.
90 (h) "Suspected adverse reaction" means any adverse event
91 for which there is a reasonable possibility that a prescription
92 medication caused such event.
93 (4) LICENSURE.—
94 (a) Each medical spa location that prepares, handles,
95 stores, administers, dispenses, distributes, or otherwise uses
96 prescription medication at its facility or in connection with
97 providing services must obtain and maintain a license from the
98 board.
99 (b) Failure to obtain a license or comply with any
100 requirements in this section may result in disciplinary action,
Page 4 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1429 2026
101 including, but not limited to, fines, suspension, or revocation
102 of the license.
103 (c) The board shall maintain a public database of each
104 medical spa licensed by this state. The database shall include,
105 at a minimum, the name, address, and license number of each
106 medical spa and the name and license number of the responsible
107 person.
108 (5) PRESCRIPTION MEDICATIONS.—
109 (a) A licensed medical spa is a dispenser under s.
110 581(3)(A) of the Federal Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C.,
111 and shall comply with the requirements provided in s. 582 of the
112 Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act, 21 U.S.C. s. 360eee-1.
113 (b) A licensed medical spa may only acquire or receive
114 prescription medication from any person who holds the license,
115 registration, permit, or other authorization required to
116 distribute or otherwise transfer such prescription medication.
117 (c)1. Prescription medications, and active pharmaceutical
118 ingredients for use in such medications, and devices shall be
119 stored in areas that are dry, well-lit, well-ventilated, and
120 maintained in a clean and orderly condition. Prescription
121 medications shall be stored in accordance with specific storage
122 requirements for controlled substances and medications,
123 consistent with the label and instructions for use of the
124 prescription medication.
125 2. Noncontrolled prescription medications and hypodermic
Page 5 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1429 2026
126 syringes, needles, and other objects used, intended for use, or
127 designed for use in parenterally injecting controlled substances
128 into the human body shall be maintained under appropriate
129 supervision and control at all times.
130 (d) A licensed medical spa shall have security controls
131 and procedures to deter and detect the theft and diversion of
132 prescription drugs. The security and control of prescription
133 drugs is the responsibility of both the responsible person and
134 the medical spa.
135 (6) RESPONSIBLE PERSON.—
136 (a) Each licensed medical spa shall have a designated
137 responsible person. The board may approve a responsible person
138 to be the responsible person at more than one location.
139 (b) The responsible person shall be physically present at
140 the medical spa location for a sufficient amount of time to
141 perform his or her responsibilities.
142 (c) The responsible person must ensure the medical spa is
143 in compliance with this section.
144 (7) INSPECTIONS.—Submission of an application for a
145 license by a medical spa constitutes permission for entry and
146 onsite inspection by the board or a third party approved by the
147 board. Such inspection will occur in connection with initial
148 licensure and as determined by the board. Refusal to allow the
149 board or third-party access to conduct an inspection is a
150 violation of this section.
Page 6 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1429 2026
151 (8) ADVERSE INCIDENTS.—
152 (a) A licensed medical spa shall notify the board within 5
153 business days after the occurrence of a serious adverse event.
154 (b) The notice shall include, to the extent such
155 information is obtained by or reasonably available to the
156 medical spa from any source, the date, the nature, and the
157 location of the adverse event and medical spa records of
158 patients directly affected by the serious adverse event.
159 (9) DECEPTIVE AND UNFAIR TRADE PRACTICES.—A licensed
160 medical spa engages in deceptive and unfair trade practices, in
161 violation of the Florida Deceptive and Unfair Trade Practices
162 Act, when, in the course of business, the medical spa
163 misrepresents a prescription medication as having:
164 (a) A particular standard, quality, or grade;
165 (b) Sponsorship, approval, characteristics, ingredients,
166 uses, or benefits;
167 (c) A function similar to a drug approved by the federal
168 Food and Drug Administration; or
169 (d) Approval from the federal Food and Drug
170 Administration.
171 (10) INVESTIGATIONS AND PENALTIES.—
172 (a) The board shall enforce this section, including
173 actions for which a license is required under this section when
174 a medical spa has failed to obtain a license. If the board has
175 or receives information that any provision of this section has
Page 7 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1429 2026
176 been violated, the board shall investigate and take appropriate
177 action.
178 (b) Violations include, but are not limited to, all of the
179 following:
180 1. Violations of the practice of pharmacy as provided
181 under chapter 465;
182 2. Violations of any rule or regulation of the board;
183 3. Violations that pose a threat to the public health, as
184 determined by the board;
185 4. Engaging or attempting to engage in the possession,
186 sale, or distribution of controlled substances as set forth in
187 chapter 893, for any other than legitimate purposes authorized
188 by this section; or
189 5. Violations of any provision of the Federal Food, Drug,
190 and Cosmetic Act, 52 Stat. 1040 (1938), 21 U.S.C. ss. 301 et
191 seq. or 21 U.S.C. ss. 801-971.
192 (c) The board shall maintain a public record of
193 disciplinary actions involving medical spas, subject to
194 transparency and confidentiality laws.
195 (11) RULES.—The board shall adopt rules to implement this
196 section within 6 months after this section takes effect.
197 Section 2. This act shall take effect upon becoming a law.
Page 8 of 8
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1429-00